New York, session 2025-2026, A9054.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 207 of the public health law is 2 amended by adding a new paragraph (t) to read as follows: 3 (t) For those at risk for Legionnaires' disease, information and 4 educational materials on the risks of Legionnaires' disease, symptoms of 5 Legionnaires' disease, preventative measures and available treatments, 6 including special consideration for seniors and vulnerable populations. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 8 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 9 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 10 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 11 completed on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13650-03-6